src/fst/test/older-gt-norm-yamls/N-A-kotawânâpiskw-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - kotawânâpisk - ok : # -m animate noun, stove    AEW NA3
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Sg: kotawânâpisk
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nikotawânâpiskw, nikotawânâpiskom]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kikotawânâpiskw, kikotawânâpiskom]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [nikotawânâpiskonân, nikotawânâpiskominân]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: [kikotawânâpiskonaw, kikotawânâpiskominaw]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kikotawânâpiskowâw, kikotawânâpiskomiwâw]

     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Pl: kotawânâpiskwak
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [nikotawânâpiskwak, nikotawânâpiskomak]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kikotawânâpiskwak, kikotawânâpiskomak]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [nikotawânâpiskonânak, nikotawânâpiskominânak]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: [kikotawânâpiskonawak, kikotawânâpiskominawak]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kikotawânâpiskowâwak, kikotawânâpiskomiwâwak]
     
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Obv: kotawânâpiskwa
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px1Sg+Obv: [nikotawânâpiskwa, nikotawânâpiskoma]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px2Sg+Obv: [kikotawânâpiskwa, kikotawânâpiskoma]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px1Pl+Obv: [nikotawânâpiskonâna, nikotawânâpiskominâna]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px12Pl+Obv: [kikotawânâpiskonawa, kikotawânâpiskominawa]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px2Pl+Obv: [kikotawânâpiskowâwa, kikotawânâpiskomiwâwa]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px3Sg+Obv: [okotawânâpiskwa, okotawânâpiskoma]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px3Pl+Obv: [okotawânâpiskowâwa, okotawânâpiskomiwâwa]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px4Sg+Obv: [okotawânâpiskoyiwa, okotawânâpiskomiyiwa]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px4Pl+Obv: [okotawânâpiskoyiwa, okotawânâpiskomiyiwa]

     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Loc: kotawânâpiskohk
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px1Sg+Loc: [nikotawânâpiskohk, nikotawânâpiskomihk]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px2Sg+Loc: [kikotawânâpiskohk, kikotawânâpiskomihk]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px1Pl+Loc: [nikotawânâpiskonâhk, nikotawânâpiskominâhk]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px12Pl+Loc: [kikotawânâpiskonâhk, kikotawânâpiskominâhk]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px2Pl+Loc: [kikotawânâpiskowâhk, kikotawânâpiskomiwâhk]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px3Sg+Loc: [okotawânâpiskohk, okotawânâpiskomihk]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px3Pl+Loc: [okotawânâpiskowâhk, okotawânâpiskomiwâhk]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px4Sg+Loc: [okotawânâpiskoyihk, okotawânâpiskomiyihk]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Px4Pl+Loc: [okotawânâpiskoyihk, okotawânâpiskomiyihk]

     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: kotawânâpiskos
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Sg: [kotawânâpiskos, kotawânâpiskosis, kotawânâpiskomis, kotawânâpiskomisis]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Sg: [nikotawânâpiskos, nikotawânâpiskosis, nikotawânâpiskomis, nikotawânâpiskomisis]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Sg: [kikotawânâpiskos, kikotawânâpiskosis, kikotawânâpiskomis, kikotawânâpiskomisis]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Sg: [nikotawânâpiskosinân, nikotawânâpiskosisinân, nikotawânâpiskomisinân, nikotawânâpiskomisisinân]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Sg: [kikotawânâpiskosinaw, kikotawânâpiskosisinaw, kikotawânâpiskomisinaw, kikotawânâpiskomisisinaw]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Sg: [kikotawânâpiskosiwâw, kikotawânâpiskosisiwâw, kikotawânâpiskomisiwâw, kikotawânâpiskomisisiwâw]

     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Pl: [kotawânâpiskosak, kotawânâpiskosisak, kotawânâpiskomisak, kotawânâpiskomisisak]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: [nikotawânâpiskosak, nikotawânâpiskosisak, nikotawânâpiskomisak, nikotawânâpiskomisisak]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Sg+Pl: [kikotawânâpiskosak, kikotawânâpiskosisak, kikotawânâpiskomisak, kikotawânâpiskomisisak]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px1Pl+Pl: [nikotawânâpiskosinânak, nikotawânâpiskosisinânak, nikotawânâpiskomisinânak, nikotawânâpiskomisisinânak]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px12Pl+Pl: [kikotawânâpiskosinawak, kikotawânâpiskosisinawak, kikotawânâpiskomisinawak, kikotawânâpiskomisisinawak]
     kotawânâpisk+N+A+Der/Dim+N+A+Px2Pl+Pl: [kikotawânâpiskosiwâwak, kikotawânâpiskosisiwâwak, kikotawânâpiskomisiwâwak, kikotawânâpiskomisisiwâwak]
